Hawaii statutes.
[§329E-6] Unintentional opioid-related
drug overdose; reporting. The department of health shall ascertain,
document, and publish an annual report on the number of, trends in, patterns
in, and risk factors related to unintentional opioid-related drug overdose
fatalities occurring each year within the State. The report shall provide
information on interventions that would be effective in reducing the rate of
fatal or nonfatal drug overdose. [L 2016, c 68, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next